Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-358.01
Isolation, defined.

(1) Isolation means intentional acts (a) committed for the purpose of preventing, and which do prevent, a vulnerable adult or senior adult from having contact with family, friends, or concerned persons; (b) committed to prevent a vulnerable adult or senior adult from receiving his or her mail or telephone calls; (c) of physical or chemical restraint of a vulnerable adult or senior adult committed for purposes of preventing contact with visitors, family, friends, or other concerned persons; or (d) which restrict, place, or confine a vulnerable adult or senior adult in a restricted area for purposes of social deprivation or preventing contact with family, friends, visitors, or other concerned persons.

(2) Isolation does not include (a) medical isolation prescribed by a licensed physician caring for the vulnerable adult or senior adult; (b) action taken in compliance with a protection order issued under the Protection Orders Act, a valid foreign protection order recognized pursuant to section 26-123 or 26-124, or an order excluding a person from certain premises issued pursuant to section 42-357; or (c) action authorized by an administrator of a nursing home pursuant to section 71-6021.

Laws 2016, LB934, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB289, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 30.

Protection Orders Act, see section 26-101.